Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4023.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 267.
SECTION 2. Restrictions on financing for districts formed under ORS 267.107. (1) As used
in this section, “mass transit district” means a district that was initiated by a resolution
pursuant to ORS 267.107.
(2) A mass transit district may not use any method of financing under ORS 267.300 other
than a method of financing authorized to be used under ORS 267.300 (1)(b) or (h) to (j)
without first obtaining authorization at a properly called election held for that purpose.
(3) If a mass transit district has adopted an ordinance under ORS 267.300 (1)(a) or (c) to
(g) on or after January 1, 2026, and before the effective date of this 2026 Act, the ordinance
is suspended until after the ordinance is approved by the electors of the mass transit district
at a properly called election held for that purpose.
SECTION 3. The section captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only for the con-
venience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express
any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 63